src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot !!≈ @CODE@
tuttu a1 ;  !!≈ * @CODE@
selvä a1 ; !!≈ * @CODE@
kuiva a1 ; !!≈ * @CODE@
pruuni a1 ; !! ...
kleini a1 ;
iso a1 ;
kova a1 ;
pitkä a1 ;
fiini a1 ;
paksu a1 ;
privaatti a3 ;  !!≈ * @CODE@ xxx a1?
pieni:piene a5 ;  !!≈ * @CODE@
moni:mone a5 ;
kuohea:kuohea a3 ;
niuhea:niuhea a3 ;
jaakea:jaakea a3 ;
sakea:sakea a3 ;
haikea:haikea a3 ;
oikea:oikea a3 ;
muikea:muikea a3 ;
valkea:valkea a3 ;
mustavalkea:mustavalkea a3 ;
lumivalkea:lumivalkea a3 ;
vitivalkea:vitivalkea a3 ;
kankea:kankea a3 ;
sokea:sokea a3 ;
karkea:karkea a3 ;
pilvenkorkea:pilvenkorkea a3 ;
notkea:notkea a3 ;
vaalea:vaalea a3 ;
pullea:pullea a3 ;
puulea:puulea a3 ;
pramea:pramea a3 ;
tahmea:tahmea a3 ;
soimea:soimea a3 ;
kumea:kumea a3 ;
rapea:rapea a3 ;
kuolemankalpea:kuolemankalpea a3 ;
nuopea:nuopea a3 ;
murea:murea a3 ;
kalsea:kalsea a3 ;
usea:usea a3 ;
lattea:lattea a3 ;
viha:viha ax ;
harmaja:harmaja ax ;
vaka:vaka ax ;
niukka:niukka ax ;
kamala:kamala a3 ;
kavala:kavala a3 ;
nokkela:nokkela a3 ;
lama:lama ax ;
tulikuuma:tulikuuma ax ;
itara:itara ax ;
lepposa:lepposa ax ;
hiilimusta:hiilimusta ax ;
läpitunkeava:läpitunkeava ax ;
sanava:sanava ax ;
vuotava:vuotava ax ;
korvaalumheuttava:korvaalumheuttava ax ;
palleva:palleva ax ;
vapiseva:vapiseva ax ;
vaiva:vaiva ax ;
versova:versova ax ;
kätheentuntuva:kätheen#tuntuva ax ;
viime:viime a2 ;
ahne:ahne a2 ;
tiine:tiine a2 ;
luone:luone a2 ;
tyyne:tyyne a2 ;
tuore:tuore a2 ;
komeaperse:komea#perse a2 ;
terve:terve a2 ;
oorninki:oorninki ax ;
krongeli:krongeli ax ;
kleini:kleini ax ;
värrempi:värrempi ax ;
nuori:nuore a5 ;
suuri:suure a_suuri ;
vissi:vissi ax ;
uusi:uute a4 ;
täysi:täyte a4 ;
enkkeltti:enkkeltti ax ;
krovi:krovi ax ;
hiljanen:hilja anen ;
molkkanen:molkka anen ;
kahenkymmenjalkanen:kahenkymmenjalka anen ;
nuskanen:nuska anen ;
ylivoimanen:ylivoima anen ;
kriunanen:kriuna anen ;
vähävaranen:vähävara anen ;
rituraitanen:rituraita anen ;
kultanen:kulta anen ;
irstanen:irsta anen ;
ammattilinen:ammattili anen ;
kaheksanjalkhainen:kaheksanjalkhai anen ;
vahvukainen:vahvukai anen ;
ruottalainen:ruottalai anen ;
monenlainen:monenlai anen ;
marjamainen:marjamai anen ;
satunainen:satunai anen ;
vierheinen:vierhei anen ;
juohleinen:juohlei anen ;
liekkinen:liekki anen ;
messinkinen:messinki anen ;
verpaalinen:verpaali anen ;
pohjalinen:pohjali anen ;
konnalinen:konnali anen ;
turvalinen:turvali anen ;
eteelinen:eteeli anen ;
liukaskielinen:liukaskieli anen ;
vähämielinen:vähämieli anen ;
ruuhmiilinen:ruuhmiili anen ;
helvetilinen:helvetili anen ;
maholinen:maholi anen ;
naispuolinen:naispuoli anen ;
tulinen:tuli anen ;
täsmälinen:täsmäli anen ;
luminen:lumi anen ;
iltauninen:iltauni anen ;
klymppinen:klymppi anen ;
vaaloverinen:vaaloveri anen ;
pihkakynsinen:pihkakynsi anen ;
syntinen:synti anen ;
automaattinen:automaatti anen ;
valkeansorttinen:valkeansortti anen ;
vakituinen:vakitui anen ;
erityinen:erityi anen ;
ryssäläinen:ryssäläi anen ;
untuvapäinen:untuvapäi anen ;
kiiltäväinen:kiiltäväi anen ;
puolikokonen:puolikoko anen ;
janonen:jano anen ;
orjaluontonen:orjaluonto anen ;
pilkkunen:pilkku anen ;
sekarotunen:sekarotu anen ;
teini-ikänen:teini-ikä anen ;
jokapäivänen:jokapäivä anen ;
lähin:lähin ax ;
avoin:avoin ax ;
kastamaton:kastamat a1_ton ;
viinaton:viinat a1_ton ;
vattaton:vattat a1_ton ;
kuloton:kulot a1_ton ;
hamphaaton:hamphaat a1_ton ;
rauhaton:rauhat a1_ton ;
rajaton:rajat a1_ton ;
pohjaton:pohjat a1_ton ;
kalaton:kalat a1_ton ;
lakkaamaton:lakkaamat a1_ton ;
huomaamaton:huomaamat a1_ton ;
lastaamaton:lastaamat a1_ton ;
leippoamaton:leippoamat a1_ton ;
antheeksiantamaton:antheeksiantamat a1_ton ;
malttamaton:malttamat a1_ton ;
polkematon:polkemat a1_ton ;
lukematon:lukemat a1_ton ;
tuntematon:tuntemat a1_ton ;
sopimaton:sopimat a1_ton ;
uskomaton:uskomat a1_ton ;
liikkumaton:liikkumat a1_ton ;
loppumaton:loppumat a1_ton ;
tottumaton:tottumat a1_ton ;
markkinaton:markkinat a1_ton ;
viraton:virat a1_ton ;
luaton:luat a1_ton ;
laeton:laet a1_ton ;
maineeton:maineet a1_ton ;
toimeton:toimet a1_ton ;
oveton:ovet a1_ton ;
parkiton:parkit a1_ton ;
mahoton:mahot a1_ton ;
ruokoton:ruokot a1_ton ;
armoton:armot a1_ton ;
lupoton:lupot a1_ton ;
jalvoton:jalvot a1_ton ;
alaston:alast a1_ton ;
loputon:loput a1_ton ;
kivuton:kivut a1_ton ;
lehetön:lehet a1_ton ;
äänetön:äänet a1_ton ;
merkitön:merkit a1_ton ;
hävytön:hävyt a1_ton ;
häikäilemätön:häikäilemät a1_ton ;
kärsimätön:kärsimät a1_ton ;
syntymätön:syntymät a1_ton ;
lypsämätön:lypsämät a1_ton ;
kestämätön:kestämät a1_ton ;
selittämätön:selittämät a1_ton ;
pärjäämätön:pärjäämät a1_ton ;
ääpätön:ääpät a1_ton ;
jäätön:jäät a1_ton ;
ujo:ujo ax ;
vaalo:vaalo ax ;
viero:viero ax ;
ontto:ontto ax ;
vaitelihas:vaiteliha aas ;
puhas:puha aas ;
hias:hia aas ;
puhelias:puhelia aas ;
laulelias:laulelia aas ;
toimelias:toimelia aas ;
kohtelias:kohtelia aas ;
vaitelias:vaitelia aas ;
utelias:utelia aas ;
armias:armia aas ;
laupias:laupia aas ;
vuotias:vuotia aas ;
kaheksantoistavuotias:kaheksantoistavuotia aas ;
hijas:hija aas ;
paljas:palja aas ;
mahakas:mahakka aas ;
puuhakas:puuhakka aas ;
lahjakas:lahjakka aas ;
marjakas:marjakka aas ;
lamakas:lamakka aas ;
virmakas:virmakka aas ;
viinarakas:viinarakka aas ;
itterakas:itte#rakka aas ;
huolekas:huolekka aas ;
monimutkikas:monimutkikka aas ;
mallikas:mallikka aas ;
ummikas:ummikka aas ;
suonikas:suonikka aas ;
rikas:rikka aas ;
finessirikas:finessirikka aas ;
hurrikas:hurrikka aas ;
praatikas:praatikka aas ;
vilkas:vilkka aas ;
ujokas:ujokka aas ;
innokas:innokka aas ;
kookas:kookka aas ;
arvokas:arvokka aas ;
klasikirkas:klasikirkka aas ;
vanhurskas:vanhurska aas ;
maukas:maukka aas ;
halukas:halukka aas ;
riemukas:riemukka aas ;
armas:arma aas ;
valpas:valppa aas ;
paras:para aas ;
ventovieras:ventoviera aas ;
mielisairas:mielisaira aas ;
kylmänhauras:kylmänhaura aas ;
viisas:viisa aas ;
itteviisas:itteviisa aas ;
karsas:karsa aas ;
raavas:raava aas ;
karvas:karva aas ;
kaunis:kauni aas ;
jylhäs:jylhäs ax ;
kuolut:kuolut ax ;
iltavirkku:iltavirkku ax ;
ylilukenu:ylilukenu ax ;
tottunu:tottunu ax ;
hupsu:hupsu ax ;
puuhunnaulattu:puuhunnaulattu ax ;
väärintavattu:väärintavattu ax ;
ostettu:ostettu ax ;
muu:muu ax ;
vastasyntyny:vastasyntyny ax ;
käsinveistetty:käsinveistetty ax ;
tiheä:tiheä a3 ;
käheä:käheä a3 ;
kröheä:kröheä a3 ;
kihkeä:kihkeä a3 ;
räikeä:räikeä a3 ;
ilkeä:ilkeä a3 ;
tärkeä:tärkeä a3 ;
sitkeä:sitkeä a3 ;
viileä:viileä a3 ;
sileä:sileä a3 ;
pehmeä:pehmeä a3 ;
kimeä:kimeä a3 ;
kevättalvenpimeä:kevättalvenpimeä a3 ;
kipeä:kipeä a3 ;
hempeä:hempeä a3 ;
oliivinvihreä:oliivinvihreä a3 ;
pyöreä:pyöreä a3 ;
hierteä:hierteä a3 ;
untuvankeveä:untuvankeveä a3 ;
hirveä:hirveä a3 ;
vähä:vähä ax ;
myrskä:myrskä ax ;
kylmä:kylmä ax ;
typerä:typerä ax ;
höpsä:höpsä ax ;
henkevä:henkevä ax ;
pyrevä:pyrevä ax ;
puoliselvä:puoliselvä ax ;
ikävä:ikävä ax ;
viikonkestävä:viikonkestävä ax ;
yllätävä:yllätävä ax ;
hölmö:hölmö ax ;
tinaton:tinat a1_ton ;
